Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.131

License application—Issuance.

Upon the filing of the application for an escrow agent license on a form provided by the director and satisfying the requirements as set forth in this chapter, the director shall issue and deliver to the applicant a license to engage in the business of an escrow agent at the location set forth in the license.

[ 1999 c 30 s 11; 1977 ex.s. c 156 s 8; 1965 c 153 s 9. Formerly RCW 18.44.090.]